Utah statutes.
73-2-1.1.   Division of Water Rights -- Creation -- Power and authority.

There is created the Division of Water Rights, which shall be within the Department of Natural Resources under the administration and general supervision of the executive director of natural resources. The Division of Water Rights shall be the water rights authority of the state of Utah and is vested with such powers and required to perform such duties as are set forth in law.

